Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.931

Effective dates—2000 c 247.

(1) Except for sections 408 and 901 through 906 of this act, this act takes effect March 1, 2002.

(2) Section 408 of this act takes effect January 1, 2004.

(3) Sections 901 through 906 of this act take effect September 1, 2000.

[ 2000 c 247 s 1201.]